Rhode Island, session 2025, SB171.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 8.16
GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION
40-8.16-1. Appropriations.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, any funding appropriated by the general
assembly of the State of Rhode Island for the support of Medicaid graduate medical education
funding, all academic medical centers who provide care to the state's critically ill and indigent
populations shall be eligible for receipt of said funding. The executive office of health and human
services is directed to use any appropriated funds to support graduate medical education programs
and research in areas including, but not limited to, trauma, primary care, maternal health, mental
health and substance abuse.
(b) The secretary of the executive office of health and human services shall determine the
appropriate Medicaid payment mechanism to implement this program and amend any state plan
documents as required to implement the payments.
(c) Payments for graduate medical education programs shall be made annually.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001053
========
LC001053 - Page 2 of 3